Mississippi statutes. Title 59. Ports, Harbors, Landings and Watercraft
Chapter 6. Compact for Development of Deep Draft Harbor and Terminal

§ 59-6-1.
“Deep Draft Harbor and Terminal” defined.

For the purpose of this chapter, the term “Deep Draft Harbor and Terminal” means a structure, series of structures, or facility of any type located on the continental shelf off the coast designed to accommodate deep draft vessels whose draft is greater than the depths of the present United States’ harbors and waterways commonly used by oceangoing traffic, and includes all functionally-related structures and facilities which are necessary or useful to the operation of the terminal whether on land or seaward of the main structure or facility.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1973, ch. 379, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 26, 1973).

§ 59-6-3.
Authorization of compact.

The governor, on behalf of this state, is hereby authorized to execute a compact, in substantially the form as provided hereinafter, with the State of Alabama.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1973, ch. 379, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 26, 1973).

§ 59-6-5.
Basic form of compact.

The basic form of the compact shall be as follows:

ARTICLE I. The purpose of this compact is to promote the development of a deep draft harbor and terminal to be located on the continental shelf of the United States, in the Gulf of Mexico, and to establish a joint interstate authority to assist in this effort.

ARTICLE II. This compact shall become effective immediately upon ratification by the legislature of each state. Any state not mentioned in this section which is contiguous with any member state may become a party to this compact, subject to approval by the legislature of each of the member states.

ARTICLE III. The states which are parties to this compact (hereinafter referred to as “party states”) do hereby establish and create a joint agency which shall be known as the Gulf Coast Superport Development Authority (hereinafter referred to as the “Authority”). The membership of which authority shall consist of the governor of each party state and five (5) other citizens of each party state, to be appointed by the governor thereof. Each appointive member of the authority shall be a citizen of that state who is interested in the promotion and development of deep draft harbor and terminals, and in the economic and industrial development of the south. The appointive members of the authority shall serve for terms of four (4) years each. Vacancies on the authority shall be filled by appointment by the governor for the unexpired portion of the term. The members of the authority shall not be compensated, but each shall be entitled to actual expenses incurred in attending meetings, or incurred otherwise in the performance of his duties as a member of the authority. The members of the authority shall hold regular quarterly meetings and such special meetings as its business may require. They shall choose annually a chairman and vice-chairman from among their members, and the chairmanship shall rotate each year among the party states in order of their acceptance of this compact. The secretary of the authority (hereinafter provided for) shall notify each member in writing of all meetings of the authority in such a manner and under such rules and regulations as the authority may prescribe. The authority shall adopt rules and regulations for the transaction of its business; and the secretary shall keep a record of all its business and shall furnish a copy thereof to each member of the authority. It shall be the duty of the authority, in general, to promote, encourage, and coordinate the efforts of the party states to secure the development of a Gulf Coast deep draft harbor and terminal. Toward this end, the authority shall have power to hold hearings; to conduct studies and surveys of all problems, benefits, and other matters associated with the development of a Gulf Coast deep draft harbor and terminal, and to make reports thereon; to acquire, by gift or otherwise, and hold and dispose of such money and property as may be provided for the proper performance of their function; to cooperate with other public or private groups, whether local, state, regional, or national, having an interest in the development of deep draft harbors and terminals; to formulate and execute plans and policies for emphasizing the purpose of this compact before the Congress of the United States and other appropriate offices and agencies of the United States; and to exercise such other powers as may be appropriate to enable it to accomplish its functions and duties in connection with the development of a deep draft harbor and terminal and to carry out the purposes of this compact.

ARTICLE IV. The authority shall appoint an executive secretary, who shall be the compact administrator. His term of office shall be at the pleasure of the authority and shall receive such compensation as the authority shall prescribe. He shall maintain custody of the authority’s books, records, and papers, which he shall keep at the office of the authority, and he shall perform all functions and duties, and exercise all powers and authorities, that may be delegated to him by the authority.

ARTICLE V. Each party state agrees that, when authorized by its legislature, it will from time to time make available and pay over to the authority such funds as may be required for the establishment and operation of the authority. The contribution of each party state shall be in the proportion that its population bears to the total population of the states which are parties hereto, as shown by the most recent official report of the United States Bureau of the Census, or upon such other basis as may be agreed upon.

ARTICLE VI. Nothing in this compact shall be construed so as to conflict with any existing statute, or to limit the powers of any party state, or to repeal or prevent legislation, or to authorize or permit curtailment or diminution of any other harbor or terminal project, or to affect any existing or future cooperative arrangement or relationship between any federal agency or a party state.

ARTICLE VII. This compact shall continue in force and remain binding upon each party state until the legislature or governor of each or either state takes action to withdraw therefrom; provided that such withdrawal shall not become effective until six (6) months after the date of the action taken by the legislature or governor. Notice of such action shall be given to the other party state or states by the secretary of state of the party state which takes such action.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1973, ch. 379, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved March 26, 1973).

§ 59-6-7.
Grant of powers; authority and duties of state officers; appointment of members of authority.

There is hereby granted to the governor, to the members of the Gulf Coast Superport Development Authority for Mississippi and to the compact administrator all the powers provided for in said compact and in this chapter. All officers of the State of Mississippi are hereby authorized and directed to do all things falling within their respective jurisdictions which are necessary or incidental to carrying out the purpose of said compact. The members of the authority appointed by the governor of the State of Mississippi under the provisions of Article III of the compact shall be with the advice and consent of the senate.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1973, ch. 379, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved March 26, 1973).